District of Columbia statutes.
22-3611

Enhanced penalty for committing crime of violence against minors.

(a)

Any adult, being at least 2 years older than a minor, who commits a crime of violence against that minor may be punished by a fine of up to 1 1/2 times the maximum fine otherwise authorized for the offense and may be imprisoned for a term of up to 1 1/2 times the maximum term of imprisonment otherwise authorized for the offense, or both.

(b)

It is an affirmative defense that the accused reasonably believed that the victim was not a minor at the time of the offense. This defense shall be established by a preponderance of the evidence.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Adult” means a person 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense.

(2)

“Crime of violence” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 23-1331(4).

(3)

“Minor” means a person under 18 years of age at the time of the offense.

History

Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 102, 53 DCR 8610

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).